Illinois, session 104th, HB4727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Certified Community Behavioral 5Health Clinics Act is amended by adding Section 3-10 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 34/3-10 new)8    Sec. 3-10. Data collection, analysis, and reporting. 9    (a) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 10collect data related to the operation and performance of 11certified community behavioral health clinics, including all 12data required under federal Certified Community Behavioral 13Health Clinic Demonstration criteria, federal and State 14Medicaid requirements applicable to certified community 15behavioral health clinics, State plan or waiver reporting 16requirements, and any additional data elements established by 17the Department. Such data shall include data received from 18managed care organizations contracted with the Department.19    (b) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 20contract with a statewide behavioral health association that 21represents more than 75% of the certified community behavioral 22health clinics operating within the State to serve as the 23State's official entity responsible for analyzing and   HB4727- 2 -LRB104 18113 BAB 31552 b1reporting data collected by the Department pursuant to this 2Section.3    (c) The Department shall provide to the statewide 4behavioral health association, subject to all applicable 5federal and State privacy laws, all administrative data 6necessary for comprehensive certified community behavioral 7health clinic system analysis, including, but not limited to, 8Medicaid claims and encounter data, certified community 9behavioral health clinic prospective payment system rate and 10cost reporting data, eligibility and enrollment data, quality 11and performance measures, and relevant data obtained from 12managed care organizations.13    (d) The statewide behavioral health association shall 14analyze and report on data provided by the Department of 15Healthcare and Family Services for the purpose of evaluating 16certified community behavioral health clinic performance, 17identifying system trends, and informing policy and 18programmatic decision making. The association shall not 19independently collect data from certified community behavioral 20health clinics and shall perform its duties solely using data 21provided by the Department.22    (e) The statewide behavioral health association shall 23produce an annual Illinois Certified Community Behavioral 24Health Clinic Statewide Performance Report, which shall 25include, at a minimum:26        (1) access and capacity metrics;  HB4727- 3 -LRB104 18113 BAB 31552 b1        (2) crisis service utilization;2        (3) quality and outcome measures;3        (4) workforce and staffing data;4        (5) financial and sustainability indicators;5        (6) service utilization trends; and6        (7) regional and statewide comparisons.7    (f) The annual report shall be submitted to the General 8Assembly, the Governor, and the Department of Healthcare and 9Family Services and shall be made publicly available.10    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 11the statewide behavioral health association shall publish the 12first Illinois Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic 13Statewide Performance Report no later than one year after the 14effective date of this amendatory Act. All subsequent reports 15shall be published annually thereafter.16    (h) The Department shall provide sufficient funding under 17the contract to enable the statewide behavioral health 18association to fulfill its responsibilities under this 19Section.20    (i) The Department may adopt rules necessary to implement 21this Section. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.